Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2,121
Real estate closing agents; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 76-2,121 to 76-2,123:

(1) Federally insured financial institution means an institution in which the monetary deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or National Credit Union Administration;

(2) Good funds means: (a) Lawful money of the United States; (b) wired funds when unconditionally held by the real estate closing agent or employee; (c) cashier's checks, certified checks, bank money orders, or teller's checks issued by a federally insured financial institution and unconditionally held by the real estate closing agent or employee; (d) United States treasury checks, federal reserve bank checks, federal home loan bank checks, State of Nebraska warrants, and warrants of a city of the metropolitan or primary class; or (e) real-time or instant payments through the FedNow® Service of the United States Federal Reserve System or through the RTP® network of The Clearing House Payments Company L.L.C.;

(3) Real estate closing agent means a person who collects and disburses funds on behalf of another in closing a real estate transaction but does not include a seller or buyer closing a real estate transaction on his or her own behalf or a lender closing a real estate loan transaction; and

(4) Regulating entity means the:

(a) Department of Insurance;

(b) Supreme Court;

(c) State Real Estate Commission;

(d) Department of Banking and Finance;

(e) Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;

(f) Office of the Comptroller of the Currency;

(g) Consumer Financial Protection Bureau;

(h) Federal Farm Credit Administration; or

(i) National Credit Union Administration.

Laws 1994, LB 1275, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 248, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB258, § 16;

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 26.